Tennessee, session 114, HB1872.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 29, Chapter 26, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Healthcare professional" means an individual, establishment, or
facility licensed, registered, certified, or permitted to provide health care to
individuals in this state pursuant to title 63 or 68 and under the regulatory
authority of:
(A) The department of health;
(B) An agency, board, council, or committee attached to the
department of health; or
(C) The health facilities commission;
(2) "Medical procedure" means:
(A) Surgically removing, modifying, altering, or entering into
tissues, cavities, or organs of a human being; or
(B) Prescribing, administering, or dispensing any puberty blocker
or hormone to a human being;
(3) ''Minor'' means an individual under eighteen (18) years of age;
(4) "Person" means an individual eighteen (18) years of age or older; and
HB1872
011157
- 1 -

(5) "Sex" means a person's immutable characteristics of the reproductive
system that define the individual as male or female, as determined by anatomy
and genetics existing at the time of birth.
(b) A person may bring a civil action to recover compensatory damages, punitive
damages, and reasonable attorney fees, court costs, and expenses against a healthcare
professional for an injury that is a result of a medical procedure, if:
(1) The medical procedure was for the purpose of enabling the person to
identify with, or live as, a purported identity inconsistent with the person's sex or
treating purported discomfort or distress from a discordance between the
person's sex and asserted identity; and
(2) The person consented, or if the person was a minor at the time of the
medical procedure, the person's parent, guardian, or legal representative
consented, in whole or in part, due to an act of coercion by the healthcare
professional.
(c) A civil action brought pursuant to subsection (b) must be brought:
(1) If the medical procedure occurred before the effective date of this act,
pursuant to this part; or
(2) If the medical procedure occurs on or after the effective date of this
act, then notwithstanding §§ 28-3-104 and 29-26-116, no later than eighteen (18)
years after the later of:
(A) The date the medical procedure occurred; or
(B) If the injury was not known to the person at the time of the
medical procedure, the date the person first obtained knowledge of the
injury that resulted from the medical procedure.
- 2 - 011157

SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011157